Washington statutes.
RCW 36.23.040

Custody and delivery of records.

The clerk shall be responsible for the safe custody and delivery to his or her successor of all books and papers belonging to his or her office.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4029; 1963 c 4 s 36.23.040. Prior: Code 1881 s 2181; 1863 p 418 s 8; 1854 p 367 s 8; RRS s 76.]